Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 1 Appointment, Qualification, and Tenure of Officers

36-1-1.
Inauguration of state officers and general assembly.

The adjutant general is hereby authorized and empowered, with the advice and approval of the governor elect, to make all proper and suitable arrangements for the inauguration of the governor and other state officers and the general assembly on the first Tuesday of January in each year in which the inauguration occurs. The general assembly shall biennially appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section, which amount shall cover the entire expense incurred on that occasion. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her order on the general treasurer for the inauguration expenses on the representation of vouchers duly audited by the adjutant general and approved by the governor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1911, ch. 730, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 416, § 31; P.L. 1935, ch. 2550, § 149; P.L. 1975, ch. 261, § 1.

36-1-2.
Engagement of office.

Every person, except the justices of the supreme and superior courts, elected to office by the general assembly, or by either house thereof, or under the provisions of the law in relation to public schools, or appointed to office, civil or military, by the governor, or by any other appointing authority, to a state board, agency or commission, shall, before he or she shall act therein, take the following engagement before some person authorized to administer oaths, namely: I, [naming the person], do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully and impartially discharge the duties of the office of [naming the office] according to the best of my abilities, and that I will support the Constitution and laws of this state, and the Constitution of the United States, so help me God: [Or: This affirmation I make and give upon the peril of the penalty of perjury.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 25, § 5; C.P.A. 1905, § 1218; G.L. 1909, ch. 31, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 31, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 490, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-2

; P.L. 2009, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 156, § 1.

36-1-2.1.
Transition of general officers.

All newly elected general officers of the state, prior to their engagement of office, shall be entitled to the following in regard to their assumption of state duties:

Space being made available for the use of a transition staff;

Adequate funds shall be provided by the outgoing general officer from the budget of that department for use to hire transition staff, obtain office supplies, and equipment;

Access to the facilities of the office to which they have been elected at all reasonable regular business hours for purposes of inspections, and at after hour times, as requested, for all reasonable purposes;

The cooperation of the outgoing administration, regarding consultation, budget information, personnel files, and information of personnel procedure, together with cooperation regarding any other reasonable request of the incoming administration; and

A mandatory audit of all money and inventory of all property within the office, to be conducted by the department of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 267, § 1.

36-1-3.
Issuance of commissions.

A commission shall issue to every person elected to office by the general assembly, to every justice of the peace elected by any town council, to the clerk and each deputy clerk of the Rhode Island district court, and to every person appointed to office by the governor and to every person appointed to office by the governor and to every person appointed to a state board, agency, or commission by any appointing authority.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 25, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 31, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 31, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 490, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-3

; P.L. 1970, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 156, § 1.

36-1-4.
Delivery of certificate of engagement to secretary of state.

Every person so elected or appointed to office shall, within thirty (30) days after the date of his or her commission, deliver to the secretary of state a certificate that he or she has been duly engaged thereon, signed by the person before whom the engagement shall have been taken.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 25, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 31, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 31, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 490, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-4

.

36-1-5.
Certificate of election of United States senators.

The governor shall give a certificate of the election of senators from this state, under the seal of the state, to the president of the senate of the United States, which certificate shall be countersigned by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 24, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 30, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-5

.

36-1-6.
Tenure of officers appointed by governor.

All persons appointed by the governor, or appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, shall severally continue in and hold their respective offices for and during the term for which they were severally appointed and until their respective successors are qualified to act, unless sooner removed in accordance with law.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, no person appointed to any office or position subject to the advice and consent of the senate shall assume such office or position or exercise any of the powers of such office or position until the senate shall have given its advice and consent to such appointment. In no case shall the governor appoint or designate any person to serve on an “interim” or “acting” basis in circumvention of this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 25, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 31, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 31, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 490, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-6

; P.L. 2004, ch. 590, § 1.

36-1-7.
Removal of officers appointed with advice and consent of senate.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law in relation to the tenure of their office, any officer appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate may be removed either by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, or as otherwise specifically provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 64; G.L. 1909, ch. 30, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-7

.

36-1-8.
Tenure of officers elected by general assembly.

All persons who have been or may hereafter be legally elected to any office by the general assembly shall severally continue in and hold their respective offices for and during the term for which they were severally elected and until their respective successors are elected and qualified to act.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 25, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 31, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 31, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 490, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-8

.

36-1-9.
Vacancies in general state offices.

In case of a vacancy in the office of secretary of state, attorney general, or general treasurer occurring when the general assembly is not in session, the governor shall appoint some person to fill the vacancy until a successor elected by the general assembly is qualified to act; and in that case, as also whenever a vacancy shall occur in either of those offices during a session of the general assembly, the vacancy shall be filled by the general assembly in grand committee.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 24, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 30, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-9

.

36-1-10.
Vacancies in offices filled by governor or grand committee.

Whenever any officer elected by the grand committee or appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall die or shall resign his or her office during a session of the general assembly to take effect immediately or at some later date, before the next meeting of the general assembly or whenever during the session of the general assembly there shall occur from any cause a vacancy in that office, the vacancy then occurring or which shall occur upon the taking effect of that resignation may be filled at that session for the unexpired term of that office in the manner provided by law for the election or appointment of that officer for a full term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1248, § 1; P.L. 1907, ch. 1430, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 30, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-10

.

36-1-11.
Power of senate to act on nominations.

Whenever at the January session of the general assembly, or otherwise, the governor is required by law to fill vacancies in or make any appointments to office, and which appointments by law require the advice and consent of the senate, the senate may give its advice and consent or refuse to give its advice and consent, but the senate shall not elect or appoint any person to any vacant office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 63; G.L. 1909, ch. 30, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 9; P.L. 1935, ch. 2220, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-11

.

36-1-12.
Time allowed for senate action on nominations — Disapproval — Withdrawal.

Whenever the senate shall have been in session for sixty (60) legislative days after notice of the making of appointments by the governor and shall not have disapproved the appointments or shall have failed to act thereon, the appointment by the governor shall stand as confirmed. If the senate shall within the sixty (60) legislative days vote to disapprove the appointment, it forthwith shall notify the governor who, within seven (7) legislative days after notice, shall again make the appointments as desired and notify the senate thereof and so on in like manner until the senate shall approve or fail to act upon or to disapprove in sixty (60) legislative days, as aforesaid, of the governor’s appointments. The governor may withdraw any appointment of which he or she has given notice to the senate at any time within sixty (60) legislative days thereafter and before action has been taken thereon by the senate.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 30, § 9; P.L. 1935, ch. 2220, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 489, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-1-12

; P.L. 1975, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 590, § 1.

36-1-13.
Member of general assembly elected or appointed to office — Time for qualification.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

36-1-4

, or of any other statute thereunto appertaining, a person who, while a member of the general assembly, is elected to office by the general assembly, or by either house thereof, or appointed to office by the governor, shall, within thirty (30) days after the date of his or her commission or within ten (10) days subsequent to the election and qualification of his or her successor as a member of the general assembly, whichever shall occur later, deliver to the secretary of state a certificate that he or she has been duly engaged thereon, signed by the person or persons before whom the engagement shall have been taken.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 93, § 2; P.L. 1964, ch. 23, § 2.